Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 2. Lights; Safety Equipment

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 208 to 231.

Driving motor vehicle without lights or with improper lights as affecting liability for collision, 21 ALR2d 7.

Lights: liability or recovery in automobile negligence action as affected by absence or insufficiency of lights on parked or standing motor vehicle, 61 ALR3d 13.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action arising out of collision or upset as affected by operation of vehicle without front lights, or with improper front lights, 62 ALR3d 560.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action arising out of collision or upset as affected by operation of vehicle without or with improper taillights or rear reflectors, 62 ALR3d 771.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action arising out of collision or upset as affected by operation of vehicle without, or with improper, clearance, load or similar auxiliary lights, 62 ALR3d 844.

Construction and operation of regulations as to dimming motor vehicle's lights, 63 ALR3d 824.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action as affected by driver's being blinded by lights of motor vehicle, 64 ALR3d 551.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action as affected by driver's being blinded by lights other than those of a motor vehicle, 64 ALR3d 760.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles § 38 to 40.

§ 31-5-910.
Lighted lamps and illuminating devices.

Every vehicle including those listed in W.S. 31-5-901(c), except as otherwise provided in this act, upon a highway within this state at any time from one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand (1,000) feet ahead shall display lighted head and other lamps and illuminating devices as respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles. Stop lights, turn signals and other signaling devices shall be lighted as prescribed for those devices.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 104; C.S. 1945, § 60-704; W.S. 1957, § 31-172; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Drivers stopped by defect in lights obligated to get vehicleoff highway. —

Where a defect in lights which leads a driver to stop is due to a condition that develops a short time before the vehicle is stopped and not to any lack of care, such a defect still makes the night operation of the vehicle on the highway unlawful and it is the driver's duty to get his vehicle off the highway if possible and safe to do so. Merback v. Blanchard, 56 Wyo. 152, 105 P.2d 272,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1940), reh'g denied, 56 Wyo. 286, 109 P.2d 49,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1941).

Quoted

in

Berta v. Ford, 469 P.2d 12,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 31-5-911.
Visibility distance.

Whenever a requirement is declared by this act as to distance from which certain lamps and devices shall render objects visible or within which the lamps or devices shall be visible, the provisions apply during the times stated in W.S.

31-5-910

in respect to a vehicle without load when upon a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions unless a different time or condition is expressly stated.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 105; C.S. 1945, § 60-705; W.S. 1957, § 31-173; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-912.
Head lamps.

A motor vehicle, including a multipurpose vehicle or an autocycle, which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width, shall be equipped with at least two (2) head lamps with at least one (1) on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which head lamps comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

A motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, multipurpose vehicle which is fifty (50) inches or less in width, moped or off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

shall be equipped with at least one (1) head lamp which shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 106; C.S. 1945, § 60-706; Laws 1957, ch. 192, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-174; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

byLaws 2007, ch. 34, § 1, amends this section by inserting “including a multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width” in (a); and inserting “multipurpose vehicle which is fifty (50) inches or less in width” in (b).

The 2017 amendment,

in the beginning of (a), added “or an autocycle,” and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (b), added "or off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

§ 31-5-913.
Tail lamps.

A motor vehicle, multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width, trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer or any other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles, shall be equipped with at least two (2) tail lamps mounted on the rear, which shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent. The superintendent may by regulation allow one (1) tail lamp on any vehicle equipped with only one (1) when it was made. A motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, multipurpose vehicle which is fifty (50) inches or less in width, autocycle, moped or off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

shall be equipped with at least one (1) tail lamp which shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration plate of all vehicles listed in subsection (a) of this section. The lamp shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

A street rod as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(N) or a custom vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(O) may use blue dot tail lights for stop lamps, rear turning indicator lamps, rear hazard lamps and rear reflectors. For purposes of this subsection, “blue dot tail light” means a red lamp installed in the rear of a motor vehicle containing a blue or purple insert that is not more than one (1) inch in diameter.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 107; C.S. 1945, § 60-707; W.S. 1957, § 31-175; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 46, § 2; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, in (a), inserted “multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width” in the first sentence, and inserted “multipurpose vehicle which is fifty (50) inches or less in length” in the final sentence.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (c).

The 2017 amendment,

in (a), added “autocycle” preceding “or moped shall.”

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (a), added "or off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

§ 31-5-914.
Rear reflectors.

Every motor vehicle, multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width, trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer or other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles shall carry on the rear, either as a part of the tail lamps or separately, two (2) or more red reflectors complying with the regulations of the superintendent. Motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, multipurpose vehicles which are fifty (50) inches or less in width, autocycles, mopeds or off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

shall carry on the rear at least one (1) red reflector complying with the regulations of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 108; C.S. 1945, § 60-708; W.S. 1957, § 31-176; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1, amends this section by inserting “multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width” in the first sentence, and inserting “multipurpose vehicles which are fifty (50) inches or less in width” in the last sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

added “autocycle” preceding “or mopeds shall.”

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence, added "or off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

§ 31-5-915.
Stop lamps; electric turn signal lamps.

Every motor vehicle, multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width, trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer or other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles shall be equipped with two (2) or more stop lamps complying with the regulations of the superintendent. Every motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, multipurpose vehicle which is fifty (50) inches or less in width, autocycle, moped or off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

shall be equipped with at least one (1) stop lamp complying with the regulations of the superintendent. The superintendent may by regulation allow one (1) stop lamp on any vehicle equipped with only one (1) when it was made.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer or other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a combination of vehicles shall be equipped with electrical flashing turn signals complying with the regulations of the superintendent except that passenger cars and trucks less than eighty (80) inches in width, manufactured or assembled prior to January 1, 1953, need not be equipped with electric turn signal lamps.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 109; C.S. 1945, § 60-709; W.S. 1957, § 31-177; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1, amends this section by inserting, in (a), “multipurpose vehicle which is greater than fifty (50) inches in width” in the first sentence, and inserting “multipurpose vehicle which is fifty (50) inches or less in width” in the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

added “autocycle” preceding “or moped shall.”

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), added "or off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

§ 31-5-916.
Additional lamps and reflectors.

The superintendent by regulation may require trucks, buses, motor homes, motor vehicles with truck-campers, trailers, semitrailers and pole trailers to have additional lamps and reflectors.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 110; C.S. 1945, § 60-710; W.S. 1957, § 31-178; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-917.
Color of lighting devices.

All lighting devices and reflectors mounted on the rear of any vehicle shall display or reflect a red color, except the stop light or other signal device, which may be red or yellow, and except that the light illuminating the license plate shall be white and the light emitted by a backup lamp shall be white.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 112; C.S. 1945, § 60-712; W.S. 1957, § 31-80; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-918

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-918.
Vehicles in combination.

Whenever motor vehicles and other vehicles are operated in combination during the time that lights are required, any lamp need not be lighted which, by reason of its location on a vehicle of the combination, would be obscured by another vehicle of the combination.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 115; C.S. 1945, § 60-715; W.S. 1957, § 31-183; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-921

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-919.
Lamps, reflectors and flags on projecting loads.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four (4) feet or more beyond the bed or body of the vehicle there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end of the load, at the times specified in W.S.

31-5-910

, two (2) red lamps, two (2) red reflectors located so as to indicate maximum width, and on each side one (1) red lamp located so as to indicate maximum overhang. There shall be displayed at all other times on any vehicle having a load which extends beyond its sides or more than four (4) feet beyond its rear, red or fluorescent orange flags, not less than twelve (12) inches square, marking the extremities of the load, at each point where a lamp would otherwise be required by this section. Lamps and reflectors required in this section shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 116; C.S. 1945, § 60-716; W.S. 1957, § 31-184; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-922

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1986, ch. 17, § 1.

§ 31-5-920.
Parked vehicles.

Every vehicle shall be equipped with one (1) or more parking lamps which shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

Whenever a vehicle is lawfully parked upon a street or highway during the hours between one-half (1/2) hour after sunset and one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise and if there is sufficient light to reveal persons and vehicles within a distance of five hundred (500) feet upon the street or highway, no lights need be displayed upon the parked vehicle.

Whenever a vehicle is parked or stopped upon a roadway or adjacent shoulder, whether attended or unattended, during the hours between one-half (1/2) hour after sunset and one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise and there is not sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of five hundred (500) feet upon the highway, the vehicle so parked or stopped shall display parking lamps complying with the requirements of the superintendent.

Any lighted head lamps upon a parked vehicle shall be depressed or dimmed.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 117; C.S. 1945, § 60-717; W.S. 1957, § 31-185; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-923

; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Driver of unlighted, parked trailer liable for damages whencar runs into rear. —

Where a driver, temporarily blinded by the lights of a car, runs into the rear of an unlighted wagon or trailer which is parked on the highway, the driver of the truck hauling the trailer, and the trucking contractor in whose general employ the driver is, are both liable in damages. Blessing v. Pittman, 70 Wyo. 416, 251 P.2d 243,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1952).

Question of negligence left to trial court. —

Where a collision might have occurred had a driver's car been in motion instead of temporarily stopped on the highway, during fog, the question of negligence, under the evidence presented, is one for the trial court. Gamet v. Beazley, 62 Wyo. 1, 159 P.2d 916,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1945).

Question of negligence left to jury. —

See Hester v. Coliseum Motor Co., 41 Wyo. 345, 285 P. 781,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1930); Jackson v. W.A. Norris, Inc., 54 Wyo. 403, 93 P.2d 498,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1939).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Regulations as to lights on parked or standing motor vehicle as affecting liability for collision, 61 ALR3d 13.

§ 31-5-921.
Farm and other vehicles and equipment; slow moving vehicle emblems.

Every vehicle, including animal-drawn vehicles and vehicles referred to in W.S. 31-5-901(c) not specifically required by other provisions of this act to be equipped with lamps or other lighting devices, shall at the times specified in W.S.

31-5-910

be equipped with at least one (1) lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than one thousand (1,000) feet to the front of the vehicle and shall also be equipped with two (2) lamps displaying red light visible from a distance of not less than one thousand (1,000) feet to the rear of the vehicle, or as an alternative, one (1) lamp displaying a red light visible from a distance of not less than one thousand (1,000) feet to the rear and two (2) red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to the rear when illuminated by the lawful lower beams of head lamps.

Every farm tractor and every self-propelled implement of husbandry manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1974, shall at all times, and every other such motor vehicle shall at all times mentioned in W.S.

31-5-910

, be equipped with lamps and reflectors as follows:

At least two (2) head lamps complying with the regulations of the superintendent;

At least one (1) red lamp visible when lighted from a distance of not less than one thousand (1,000) feet to the rear mounted as far to the left of the center of the vehicle as possible;

At least two (2) red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps.

On every combination of farm tractors and towed farm equipment or towed implement of husbandry, the farm tractor shall be equipped as required by subsection (b) of this section, and the towed unit shall at all times mentioned in W.S.

31-5-910

be equipped with lamps and reflectors as follows:

If the towed unit or its load extends more than four (4) feet to the rear of the tractor or obscures any light thereon, the unit shall be equipped on the rear with at least one (1) red lamp visible when lighted from a distance of not less than one thousand (1,000) feet to the rear mounted as far to the left of the center of the towed vehicle as practicable, and at least two (2) red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps;

If the towed unit of the combination extends more than four (4) feet to the left of the center line of the tractor, the unit shall be equipped on the front with an amber reflector visible from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to one hundred (100) feet to the front when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps. The reflector shall be so positioned to indicate as nearly as practicable, the extreme left projection of the towed unit.

Every farm tractor and every self-propelled unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry and special mobile equipment designed for operation at speeds not in excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour shall at all times be equipped with a slow moving vehicle emblem mounted on the rear except as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

Every combination of farm tractor and towed farm equipment or towed implement of husbandry or units towed by special mobile equipment normally operating at speeds not in excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour shall at all times be equipped with a slow moving vehicle emblem as follows:

Where the towed unit or any load thereon obscures the slow moving vehicle emblem on the towing unit, the towed unit shall be equipped with a slow moving vehicle emblem. In such cases, the towing vehicle need not display the emblem;

Where the slow moving vehicle emblem on the towing unit is not obscured by the towed unit or its load, then either or both may be equipped with the required emblem but it shall be sufficient if either has it.

Use of the slow moving vehicle emblem is not required on highway construction and maintenance equipment when the vehicle is operated exclusively within areas guarded by a flagman or clearly visible warning signs.

No person shall use the slow moving vehicle emblem except as required in this section nor display the emblem on a vehicle traveling at a speed in excess of twenty-five (25) miles per hour nor on a stationary object along the highway.

The emblem required in subsections (d) and (e) of this section shall comply with current standards and specifications of the American Society of Agricultural Engineers.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 118; C.S. 1945, § 60-718; W.S. 1957, § 31-186; Laws 1973, ch. 194, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-924

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Special mobile equipment. —

Driver's license was properly suspended under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-6-102

because a police officer had probable cause to initiate a traffic stop as the forklift operated by the driver on the shoulder of a highway was “special mobile equipment” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-921(d) and thus required to have a “slow moving vehicle” emblem.
Lindsey v. Harriet, 2011 WY 80, 255 P.3d 873,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2011).

§ 31-5-922.
Spot lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two (2) spot lamps and every lighted spot lamp shall be so aimed and used upon approaching another vehicle that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will strike the windshield, or any windows, mirror, or occupant of another vehicle in use.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 119; C.S. 1945, § 60-719; W.S. 1957, § 31-187; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-925

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-923.
Vehicular traffic hazard lamps.

Any vehicle including those referred to in W.S. 31-5-901(c) may be equipped with lamps for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing.

After January 1, 1986, every bus, truck, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer eighty (80) inches or more in over-all width or thirty (30) feet or more in over-all length shall be equipped with lamps complying with the regulations of the superintendent.

Lamps allowed by this section shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-924.
Multiple-beam lamps.

Whenever a motor vehicle including those referred to in W.S. 31-5-901(c) if equipped with multiple-beam lamps is being operated on a highway during the times specified in W.S.

31-5-910

, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

Whenever a driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle, the driver shall, before coming within five hundred (500) feet of the oncoming vehicle use a distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The lowermost distribution of light or composite beam, shall be aimed to avoid glare at all times, regardless of road contour and loading;

Whenever the driver of a vehicle approaches another vehicle within three hundred (300) feet from the rear, the driver shall use a distribution of light other than the uppermost distribution of light.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 123; C.S. 1945, § 60-723; W.S. 1957, § 31-190; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-928

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Failure to dim is violation of section and is sufficient to constitute negligence.

Edwards v. Harris, 397 P.2d 87,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 31-5-925.
Single-beam lamps.

Head lamps which provide only a single distribution of light shall be permitted on all farm tractors regardless of date of manufacture, and on other motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to July 1, 1956, if the head lamps comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 124; C.S. 1945, § 60-724; W.S. 1957, § 31-191; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-929

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-926.
Alternate lighting for slow-moving vehicles.

Any motor vehicle may be operated under the conditions specified in W.S.

31-5-910

when equipped with two (2) lighted lamps upon the front thereof capable of revealing persons and objects one hundred (100) feet ahead in lieu of head lamps otherwise required under this act if the vehicle is not operated at a speed in excess of twenty (20) miles per hour.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 126; C.S. 1945, § 60-726; W.S. 1957, § 31-193; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-931

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-927.
Number of driving lamps.

Whenever a motor vehicle including those referred to in W.S. 31-5-901(c) equipped with head lamps as required in this act is also equipped with any other driving lamps on the front thereof, not more than a total of four (4) of the lamps on the front of a vehicle shall be lighted at any one (1) time when upon a highway. Driving lamps do not include turn or hazard warning signal lamps.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 127; C.S. 1945, § 60-727; W.S. 1957, § 31-194; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-932

; Laws 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-928.
General lighting restrictions; authorized emergency vehicles.

During the times specified in W.S.

31-5-910

, any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle other than head lamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, flashing turn signals, vehicle hazard warning lamps and school bus warning lamps, which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than three hundred (300) candlepower shall be so directed that no part of the high intensity portion of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than seventy-five (75) feet from the vehicle.

Except as required in W.S.

31-5-929

and this section, no person shall drive or move any vehicle or equipment upon any highway with any lamp or device thereon capable of displaying a red light or blue light visible from directly in front of the center thereof.

Flashing lights are prohibited except as authorized by W.S.

31-5-915

,

31-5-921

,

31-5-929

,

31-5-930

,

31-5-931

and this section.

Every authorized emergency vehicle, except law enforcement vehicles and as otherwise specified in this subsection, shall, in addition to any other equipment required by law, be equipped with at least one (1) red lamp visible from five hundred (500) feet in front of the vehicle. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, every authorized emergency vehicle, may be equipped with one (1) or more blue, white or amber lights. Vehicles used or contracted by a municipality, county or the department to clear snow from public streets, roads or highways may be equipped with one (1) or more lights of a conspicuous color as specified by rules adopted by the department. Privately-owned vehicles used by members of a fire department or emergency service organization in performing or traveling to perform assigned duties in those organizations shall display at least one (1) flashing white, red or amber light, but no blue lights, visible from five hundred (500) feet in front of the vehicle.

A police vehicle primarily engaged in traffic law enforcement shall be marked so as to be readily identifiable.

The following vehicles are authorized to display flashing white and amber lights in addition to those otherwise authorized by law:

Vehicles of civil emergency preparedness agencies;

Vehicles of municipalities and public service corporations;

Wreckers;

Funeral cars.

In addition to these lights otherwise authorized by law, a wrecker is authorized to display flashing red and blue lights at the scene of any emergency.

In addition to those lights otherwise authorized by law, a public utility vehicle may display one (1) or more flashing red lights visible from five hundred (500) feet of the vehicle when providing emergency services. For purposes of this subsection, “public utility” means as defined in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 128; C.S. 1945, § 60-728; W.S. 1957, § 31-195; Laws 1977, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-933

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1985, ch. 138, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 122, § 1; 2017 ch. 46, § 1, effective February 17, 2017; 2021 ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

inserted the present third sentence in (d).

Laws 2009, ch. 122, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.

The 2017 amendment,

in (d), substituted “law enforcement” for “police” in the first sentence, substituted “used or contracted by a municipality, county or the” for “used by the”, and inserted “streets, roads or.”

Laws 2017, ch. 46, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (h).

§ 31-5-929.
School buses.

Every school bus shall, in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required by this act, be equipped with signal lamps mounted as high and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, which shall display to the front two (2) alternately flashing red lights located at the same level and to the rear two (2) alternately flashing red lights located at the same level, and these lights shall be visible at five hundred (500) feet in normal sunlight.

Any school bus shall, in addition to the lights required by subsection (a) of this section, be equipped with yellow signal lamps mounted near each of the four (4) red lamps and at the same level but closer to the vertical centerline of the bus, which shall display two (2) alternately flashing yellow lights to the front and two (2) alternately flashing yellow lights to the rear, and these lights shall be visible at five hundred (500) feet in normal sunlight. These lights shall be displayed by the school bus at least one hundred (100) feet, but not more than five hundred (500) feet, before every stop at which the alternately flashing red lights required by subsection (a) of this section will be actuated.

The superintendent is authorized to adopt standards and specifications applicable to lighting equipment on and special warning devices to be carried by school buses consistent with this act, but supplemental thereto. The standards and specifications shall correlate with and, so far as possible, conform to the specifications then current as approved by the Society of Automotive Engineers.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 88; C.S. 1945, § 60-688; W.S. 1957, § 31-196; Laws 1961, ch. 11, § 1; 1965, ch. 50, § 1; 1967, ch. 172, § 2; 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1975, ch. 75, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-934

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and in the first sentence in subsection (c), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-930.
Highway construction and maintenance vehicles.

The superintendent shall adopt specifications and rules governing the use of flashing lights on vehicles engaged in highway construction or maintenance operations.

The driver of a vehicle engaged in highway construction or maintenance shall comply with rules adopted under this section.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 129; C.S. 1945, § 60-729; W.S. 1957, § 31-197; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-935

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-931.
Backup and side marker lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two (2) backup lamps either separately or in combination with other lamps, but any such backup lamp shall not be lighted when the motor vehicle is in forward motion.

Any vehicle may be equipped with one (1) or more side marker lamps and any side marker lamp may be flashed in conjunction with turn or vehicular hazard warning signals.

Lamps allowed by this section shall comply with the regulations of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 121; C.S. 1945, § 60-721; W.S. 1957, § 31-198; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-936

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-932.
Approved sale of lighting devices; mounting.

No person shall have for sale, sell or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, motorcycle, autocycle, motor-driven cycle, moped or pole trailer, or use upon the vehicle any head lamp, auxiliary or fog lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp or reflector, which reflector is required by this article, or parts of any of the foregoing which tend to change the original design or performance, unless of a type which has been submitted to the superintendent and approved by him. This section does not apply to equipment in actual use prior to January 1, 1956, or replacement parts therefor.

No person shall have for sale, sell or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer any lamp or device mentioned in this section which has been approved by the superintendent unless the lamp or device bears thereon the trade-mark or name under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed.

No person shall use upon any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer any lamps mentioned in this section unless the lamps are mounted, adjusted and aimed in accordance with instructions of the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 130; C.S. 1945, § 60-730; W.S. 1957, § 31-199; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-937

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 301; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “by this article” for “hereunder” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2017 amendment,

in (a), added “autocycle” following “semitrailer, motorcycle” and made a related the change.

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

§ 31-5-933.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 138, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1, related to permit allowing vehicle operation in violation of equipment requirements.

§ 31-5-934.
Approved sale of equipment generally.

A person shall not sell or offer for sale any lamp, reflector, hydraulic brake fluid, seat belt, safety glass, emergency disablement warning device, studded tire, motorcycle helmet, eye protection device for motorists, or red rear bicycle reflector unless and until it has been approved by the superintendent.

A person shall not sell or offer for sale any item of equipment for which a standard has been adopted under W.S.

31-5-935

unless and until it has been approved by the superintendent.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-935.
Standards for safety equipment.

The superintendent shall adopt standards for lamps, reflectors, hydraulic brake fluids, seat belts, safety glass, emergency disablement warning devices, studded tires, motorcyclist helmets, eye protection devices and red rear bicycle reflectors.

The superintendent may adopt standards for safety equipment that comply with standards of the United States Department of Transportation.

Standards adopted by the superintendent may conform with standards issued or endorsed by any recognized organization or agency such as the United States Department of Transportation and other federal agencies, Vehicle Equipment Safety Commission, American National Standards Institute and Society of Automotive Engineers.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-936.
Identification requirements for equipment.

Any equipment described in W.S.

31-5-934

or any package containing the equipment shall bear the manufacturer’s trade mark or brand name unless it complies with identification requirements of the United States Department of Transportation or other federal agencies.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trademarks and service marks generally, see chapter 1 of title 40.

§ 31-5-937.
Approval of safety equipment by superintendent.

The superintendent shall approve or disapprove any lighting device or other safety equipment, component or assembly of a type for which approval is specifically required in this act within a reasonable time after approval has been requested.

The superintendent shall establish the procedure to be followed when request for approval of any lighting device or other safety equipment, component or assembly is submitted under this section. The procedure may provide for submission of the device, component or assembly to the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators as the agent of the superintendent and for the issuance of an approval certificate by the association in the name of the superintendent in lieu of submission of the device, component or assembly to the superintendent. Approval issued by the association shall have the same force and effect as if it had been issued by the superintendent.

The superintendent shall maintain and publish lists of all devices, components or assemblies which have been approved by him.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 131; C.S. 1945, § 60-731; W.S. 1957, § 31-200; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-938

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-938.
Duration of superintendent's approval.

Approvals shall remain valid unless revoked under W.S.

31-5-939

or unless the superintendent requires them to be renewed under regulations issued by him.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.